Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 17.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201085-1919
Applicability of act.

The Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act does
not grant any authority to the commission to (1) control or influence the
policies of any eligible postsecondary educational institution because such
institution accepts students who receive awards or (2) require any eligible
postsecondary educational institution to enroll any student receiving an award
or, once admitted, to continue in such institution any student receiving an
award.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 19;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 17.